Utah statutes.
31A-7-310.   Officers', directors', and employees' liability and indemnification.

Section 31A-5-415 applies to officers', directors', and employees' liability and indemnification in corporations organized and operating under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

